Tennessee, session 114, HB1766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 34-1-111(d)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) The accounting must contain a statement concerning the physical or mental
condition of the person with a disability and the date of the fiduciary's last contact with
the person with a disability. The statement must also advise the court whether the
condition of the respondent continues to require the fiduciary's services without
disclosing medical information required to be kept confidential pursuant to § 34-3-105(f).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1766
009733
- 1 -